Arkansas, session 2025, HB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Ballot Draw Standardization Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(j), concerning candidate filing
procedures, is amended to read as follows:
(j)(1) On the day after the deadline for candidates to file for a
position on the board of directors by petition, the county clerk of the
county in which the school district is domiciled for administrative purposes
shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the names of
those candidates who are registered voters in the school district and the
electoral zone, if applicable, and who have qualified for the ballot by
petition a list of candidates for the board of directors, arranged by
contest, with the candidates listed in the order in which they filed their
petitions and with the earliest filing candidate listed first.
(2) The list under subdivision (j)(1) of this section shall
*MBM038*
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
include the date and time that the candidate's petition was filed.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(k), concerning candidate filing
procedures for school elections, is amended to read as follows:
(k)(1) The order in which the names of the respective candidates are
to appear on the ballot shall be determined by lot at the public meeting of
the county board of election commissioners held not later than:
(1)(A) The deadline to conduct the ballot draw for the
preferential primary or general election for an annual school election held
in even-numbered years;
(2)(B) The seventh day of March for an annual school
election held on the second Tuesday in May of an odd-numbered year; and
(3)(C) Seventy-two (72) days before an annual school
election held on the second Tuesday of November of an odd-numbered year.
(2)(A) The lot to determine the order in which a candidate’s
name appears on the ballot shall be drawn by the candidate or his or her
designee.
(B)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (k)(2)(B)(ii) of
this section, a person shall not be designated to draw by lot for more than
one (1) candidate at the public meeting under subdivision (k)(1) of this
section to determine the order in which the names of the candidates appear on
the ballot.
(ii) If a candidate does not appear in person to
draw by lot and does not designate a person to draw by lot on his or her
behalf, the lot shall be drawn by a member of the county board of election
commissioners or a person designated by the county board of election
commissioners.
(C) Lots shall be drawn by contest in the following order
as certified to the county board of election commissioners by the Secretary
of State or the county clerk:
(i) First, by all candidates who appear in person;
(ii) Second, by all persons designated by a
candidate; and
(iii) Third, by members of the county board of
election commissioners or persons designated by the county board of election
commissioners.
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-5-203(a)(1), concerning the certification
of candidate lists, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Not less than seventy-five (75) days before each general
election day, the Secretary of State shall certify to all county boards of
election commissioners full lists of all candidates to be voted for in their
respective counties as the nominations have been certified or otherwise
properly submitted to him or her, arranged by contest, with the candidates
listed in the order in which they filed for office and with the earliest
filing candidate listed first.
(B) The list under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section
shall include the date and time that the candidate filed for office.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-5-203(b)(1), concerning the certification
of candidate lists, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) Not less than seventy-five (75) days before each general
election day, the clerk of each county shall certify to the county board of
election commissioners of his or her county a full list of all candidates to
be voted for in the county as the nominations have been certified or
otherwise properly submitted to him or her, arranged by contest, with the
candidates listed in the order in which they filed for office and with the
earliest filing candidate listed first.
(B) The list under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section
shall include the date and time that the candidate filed for office.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 7-5-207(c), concerning the draw for ballot
position, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) The order in which the names of the candidates shall appear
on the ballot shall be determined by lot at a public meeting of the county
board of election commissioners not less than seventy-two (72) days before
the general election.
(B)(i) The lot to determine the order in which a
candidate’s name appears on the ballot shall be drawn by the candidate or his
or her designee.
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(iii) of this section, a person shall not be designated to draw by
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
lot for more than one (1) candidate at the public meeting under subdivision
(c)(1)(A) of this section to determine the order in which the names of the
candidates appear on the ballot.
(iii) If a candidate does not appear in person to
draw by lot and does not designate a person to draw by lot on his or her
behalf, the lot shall be drawn by a member of the county board of election
commissioners or a person designated by the county board of election
commissioners.
(C) Lots shall be drawn by contest in the following order
as certified to the county board of election commissioners by the Secretary
of State or the county clerk:
(i) First, by all candidates who appear in person;
(ii) Second, by all persons designated by a
candidate; and
(iii) Third, by members of the county board of
election commissioners or persons designated by the county board of election
commissioners.
(2) Notice of the public meeting under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of
this section shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county at least three (3) days before the drawing.
(3) For runoff elections, the ballot order for eligible
candidates shall be the same as for the previous election leading to the
runoff.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 7-7-203(d), concerning primary elections,
is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A) At least seventy-five (75) days before the preferential
primary election, the Secretary of State shall certify to the various county
committees and to the various county boards of election commissioners a list
of the names of all candidates who have filed party certificates with the
Secretary of State within the time required by law, arranged by contest, with
the candidates listed in the order in which they filed their party
certificates and with the earliest filing candidate listed first.
(B) The list under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section
shall include the date and time that the candidate filed his or her party
certificate.
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
(2)(A) At least seventy-five (75) days before the preferential
primary election, the county clerk shall certify to the county committees and
to the county board of election commissioners a list of the names of all
candidates who have filed party certificates with the county clerk within the
time required by law, arranged by contest, with the candidates listed in the
order in which they filed their party certificates and with the earliest
filing candidate listed first.
(B) The list under subdivision (d)(A) of this section
shall include the date and time that the candidate filed his or her party
certificate.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 7-7-304(a)(1), concerning names to be
included on primary ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The Secretary of State shall certify to all county boards of
election commissioners full lists of the names of all candidates who have
filed party certificates with him or her to be placed on the ballots in their
respective counties at the preferential primary election not less than:
(A)(i) Seventy-five (75) days before a preferential
primary election that is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B)(ii) Ninety-two (92) days before a preferential
primary election that is held in March under § 7-7-203.
(B) The list under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section
shall:
(i) Be arranged by contest, with the candidates
listed in the order in which they filed their party certificates and with the
earliest filing candidate listed first; and
(ii) Include the date and time that the candidate
filed his or her party certificate.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 7-7-304(b)(1), concerning names to be
included on primary ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The county clerk shall certify to the county board of
election commissioners full lists of the names of all candidates who have
filed party certificates with him or her to be placed on the ballot at the
preferential primary election not less than:
(A)(i) Seventy-five (75) days before a preferential
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
primary election that is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B)(ii) Ninety-two (92) days before a preferential
primary election that is held in March under § 7-7-203.
(B) The list under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section
shall:
(i) Be arranged by contest, with the candidates
listed in the order in which they filed their party certificates and with the
earliest filing candidate listed first; and
(ii) Include the date and time that the candidate
filed his or her party certificate.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 7-7-305(b), concerning the draw for ballot
position in primary elections, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The order in which the names of the respective candidates are
to appear on the ballots at all preferential and general primary elections
shall be determined by lot at the public meeting of the county board of
election commissioners held not later than:
(A) Seventy-two (72) days before a preferential primary
election that is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B) Eighty-nine (89) days before a preferential primary
election that is held in March under § 7-7-203.
(2)(A) The lot to determine the order in which a candidate’s
name appears on the ballot shall be drawn by the candidate or his or her
designee.
(B)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B)(ii) of
this section, a person shall not be designated to draw by lot for more than
one (1) candidate at the public meeting under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section to determine the order in which the names of the candidates appear on
the ballot.
(ii) If a candidate does not appear in person to
draw by lot and does not designate a person to draw by lot on his or her
behalf, the lot shall be drawn by a member of the county board of election
commissioners or a person designated by the county board of election
commissioners.
(C) Lots shall be drawn by contest in the following order
as certified to the county board of election commissioners by the Secretary
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
of State or the county clerk:
(i) First, by all candidates who appear in person;
(ii) Second, by all persons designated by a
candidate; and
(iii) Third, by members of the county board of
election commissioners or persons designated by the county board of election
commissioners.
(2)(3) The county board of election commissioners shall give at
least ten (10) days' written notice of the time and place of the meeting to
the chairs of the county committees if the chairs are not members of the
county board of election commissioners, and at least three (3) days before
the meeting, shall publish notice of the time and place of holding the
meeting in some newspaper of general circulation in the county.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 14-42-206(a)(4), concerning municipal
primary elections, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Candidates nominated for municipal office by political
primaries under this section shall be certified by the county party
committees to the county board of election commissioners and shall be placed
on the ballot at the general election.
(B) The certification under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this
section shall:
(i) Be arranged by contest, with the candidates
listed in the order in which they filed their party certificates and with the
earliest filing candidate listed first; and
(ii) Include the date and time that the candidate
filed his or her party certificate.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 14-42-206(b)(3)(C), concerning municipal
primary elections, is amended to read as follows:
(C) The county clerk promptly shall:
(i) notify Notify the candidate of the result; and
(ii)(a) Certify to the county board of election
commissioners the names of those candidates who have qualified for the ballot
by petition and the date and time that each candidate filed his or her
petition.
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
(b) The certification under subdivision
(b)(3)(C)(ii(a) of this section shall:
(1) Be arranged by contest, with the
candidates listed in the order in which they filed their petitions and with
the earliest filing candidate listed first; and
(2) Include the date and time that the
petition naming the candidate was filed.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 14-47-110(a)(3)(D)(i), concerning the
election of directors, is amended to read as follows:
(D)(i)(a) The name of the candidate mentioned in each
petition, together with a copy of the election proclamation if the election
is a special election, shall be certified by the city clerk or recorder to
the county board of election commissioners not less than seventy-five (75)
days before the election unless the city clerk or recorder finds that the
petition fails to meet the requirements of this chapter.
(b) The certification under subdivision
(a)(3)(D)(i)(a) of this section shall:
(1) Be arranged by contest, with the
candidates listed in the order in which they filed their petitions and with
the earliest filing candidate listed first; and
(2) Include the date and time that the
petition naming the candidate was filed.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 14-48-109(a)(6)(C), concerning the
election of the mayor and directors in a city with the city administrator
form of government, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) The name of the candidate mentioned in each
petition, together with a copy of the election proclamation if the election
is a special election, shall be certified by the city clerk or recorder to
the county board of election commissioners not less than seventy-five (75)
days before the election unless the city clerk or recorder finds that the
petition fails to meet with the requirements of this chapter.
(ii) The certification under subdivision
(a)(6)(C)(i) of this section shall:
(a) Be arranged by contest, with the
03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/10/25 HB1070
candidates listed in the order in which they filed their petitions and with
the earliest filing candidate listed first; and
(b) Include the date and time that the
candidate filed his or her petition.

/s/John Carr






























03-10-2025 11:29:54 MBM038